Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB490.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5762. Bail of persons posing threat to public safety.(a) Issuing authority release.--Notwithstanding any other provision of rule or law, no issuing authority may permit the release of a defendant on the defendant's own recognizance or subject to an unsecured monetary condition of release if the defendant is a person posing a threat to public safety.(b) Arresting officer release.--An arresting officer may not release a person from custody prior to taking the person without unnecessary delay to appear before the issuing authority if the arrest is of a person posing a threat to public safety.(c) Denying bail.--Nothing in this section shall preclude 12345678910111213141516171819 the issuing authority from denying bail and detaining a person prior to trial if the issuing authority finds, substantially more likely than not, that no condition or combination of conditions of bail will reasonably ensure the safety of a person or the community if the person is released on bail.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Modify the presumption of innocence.(2) Eliminate or limit the ability of an individual to seek a bail modification hearing before the issuing authority or a court of competent jurisdiction in accordance with any other provision of law or rule of procedure.(3) Limit an issuing authority from setting bail at a secured amount or otherwise detaining a person subject to arrest.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Person posing a threat to public safety." A person subject to arrest who poses a threat to a victim, an individual or the public at large. The term includes, but is not limited to, a person to whom any of the following applies:(1) The person is charged with committing a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702.1 (relating to assault of law enforcement officer) or 5104.2 (relating to evading arrest or detention on foot).(2) The person is charged with committing a crime of violence as defined in section 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses), and, within five years prior to the arrest, excluding time spent confined to a State 20250SB0490PN0444 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or county correctional institution or juvenile detention center, the person was:(i) convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 9714(g); or(ii) adjudicated delinquent by a court because of conduct which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a crime of violence as defined in section 9714(g).(3) The person is charged with committing a violation of section 13(a)(30) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or an attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit an offense under section 13(a)(30) of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, and there is probable cause to believe that the substance weighs 10 grams or more and contains fentanyl, a fentanyl derivative or carfentanil.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0490PN0444 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617